Massachusetts, session 194th, S396.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the 
following new chapter: 
An Act for: Ending Common Core Curriculum, and establishing certain other curriculum 
standards. 
1.) The interest of parents, students, families, teachers, and many others, in achieving the 
best of educational standards has, in many ways, been influenced by serious concerns about the 
“Common Core” Curriculum. – A recent Ballot Question, eliminated the MCAS Test, as a 
Graduation Requirement; but left in place, the Common Core Curriculum. – This statute, is 
focused on the need for basic, and improved curriculum standards.  

of 3 10  2.) This legislation, seeks to spare the negative effects of the Common Core Curriculum, 
and establish certain new standards for curriculum in schools.  
Therefore, the language below is proposed, and upon passage, is adopted:  
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the 
contrary, the vote taken by the Massachusetts Board of Elementary and Secondary Education on 
July 21, 2010, to adopt the Common Core State Standards for Mathematics and English 
Language Arts is hereby rescinded. The curriculum frameworks in Mathematics and English 
Language Arts that were in effect prior to that date are hereby restored.  
SECTION 3. Section 1D of Chapter 69 is hereby amended in the second paragraph by 
inserting after the first sentence, the following new sentences:  
The process shall include committees made up exclusively of public school teachers and 
academics from private and public colleges and universities established and operated in 
Massachusetts. The Commissioner shall copyright the frameworks, which shall be wholly owned 
by the Department; permission shall be granted to copy any or all parts of these frameworks for 
non-commercial educational purposes.  
SECTION 4. Said section 1D of chapter 69 is hereby further amended in the second 
paragraph by inserting after the third sentence the following new sentences:  
There shall be three review committees, one for each discipline of math, science and 
technology and English. Each review committee shall have three members appointed by the 
governor who shall choose said members from private or public research universities established 
and operated in Massachusetts for each of the disciplines.  

of 3 31  For the purposes of this section, a “research university” is any university that awards 
doctoral degrees in the arts and sciences. Each review committee shall warrant by a two-thirds 
vote that the frameworks are equivalent to the standards of the most educationally advanced 
nations as determined by the Trends in Mathematics and Sciences Study. No framework shall be 
approved by the board without such a warrant. – This means that standards should be at the 
highest International Standards.  
SECTION 5. Section 1I of Chapter 69 is hereby amended in the third paragraph by 
inserting after the second sentence, the following new sentence:  
In order to better inform the teachers and administrators about the diagnostic 
assessments, after the administration of the assessments but before the start of the new school 
year, the Commissioner shall release all of the test items, including questions, constructed 
responses and essays, for each grade and every subject.  
SECTION 6. The several provisions of this Act are independent and severable and the 
invalidity, if any, of any part or feature thereof shall not affect or render the remainder of the Act 
invalid or inoperative. 
SECTION 7. This act shall take effect immediately upon becoming law.